Hawaii statutes.
§351-12 Tenure and compensation of members.
(a) The term of office of each member of the commission shall be four years or
until the member's successor is appointed, except that any member appointed to
fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the
member's predecessor was appointed shall be appointed for the remainder of the
term. Each member shall be eligible for reappointment, subject to section 26-34.
A vacancy in the commission shall not affect its powers. If any member is
unable to act because of absence, illness, or other sufficient cause, the
governor may make a temporary appointment, and the appointee shall have all the
powers accorded the regular member for the period of the temporary appointment.

(b) Each member shall be compensated at the
rate of $100 per day for each day's actual attendance to the member's duties;
provided that the compensation shall not exceed a maximum of $10,000 per year.
Members shall be paid necessary traveling and subsistence expenses incurred in
the discharge of their duties. [L 1967, c 226, pt of §1; HRS §351-12;
gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 177, §5; am L 1990, c 136, §2; am L 1992, c 260, §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Cited, as a constitutional board and commission statute where
members may serve as holdovers until their successors are
"appointed", without any reference to the successors being fully
"qualified"; an "appointment" properly occurs under the
interim appointments provision of article V, §6 of the state constitution.
Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next